Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB112.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. (a) No city shall require a real property owner to grant a
right-of-way to such city, or any extension of an existing right-of-way as a
condition for consideration or approval of any building permit unless such
real property owner consents to such grant and the city pays fair
compensation to such owner for such grant.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a city from requiring the
grant of a right-of-way from two or more adjoining real property owners
when such grant is necessary for the improvement of public streets or
facilities.
Sec. 2. (a) No county shall require a real property owner to grant a
right-of-way to such county, or any extension of an existing right-of-way
as a condition for consideration or approval of any building permit unless
such real property owner consents to such grant and the county pays fair
compensation to such owner for such grant.
(b) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a county from requiring the
grant of a right-of-way from two or more adjoining real property owners
when such grant is necessary for the improvement of public roads or
facilities.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.